Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1427
Department; powers.

The department may examine the records of any person holding a license or permit, required to hold a license or permit, or purchasing motor fuel without the payment of tax at any time during regular business hours and make such other investigations as it deems necessary for the proper and efficient administration and enforcement of the agreement.

Laws 2018, LB177, § 13.
July 19, 2018